District of Columbia statutes.
31-4105

Countersignatures not required.

A policy of insurance issued to a risk retention group, or any member of that group, shall not be required to be countersigned as otherwise provided in the District of Columbia insurance law.

Oct. 21, 1993, D.C. Law 10-46, § 6, 40 DCR 6082

History

1981 Ed., § 35-2905.

Prior Codifications